California, session 20252026, AB877.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1348.97 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1348.97. (a) The department shall prepare and send one digital or hardcopy letter to each chief financial officer of a health care service plan that provides coverage, including out-of-network benefits, in California for substance use disorder in residential facilities, in accordance with the following requirements: (1) (A) The letter shall include a statement informing the health care service plan that substance use disorder treatment in licensed and certified or unlicensed residential facilities is almost exclusively nonmedical, with rare exceptions. (B) The letter shall include a statement informing the health care service plan of the requirements to bill nonmedical treatment accordingly. (2) The letter shall include a statement that informs the health care service plan of the circumstances that allow for medical treatment for substance use disorder in licensed and certified or unlicensed residential facilities. (b) For purposes of this section, “residential facility” means a place, building, or premises that provides residential care or services. all of the following:(1) Any family home, group care facility, or similar facility determined by the department, for 24-hour nonmedical care of persons in need of personal services, supervision, or assistance essential for sustaining the activities of daily living or for the protection of the individual. (2) An alcohol or other drug program certified by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 11832) of Part 2 of Division 10.5.(3) An alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 11834.01) of Part 2 of Division 10.5.(4) A recovery residence as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 11833.05.(c) The department shall consult with the State Department of Social Services, and may consult with the Department of Insurance and the State Department of Health Care Services, when preparing the content of the letters required by subdivision (a). (d) The department shall send the letters required by subdivision (a) on or before ____. October 1, 2026.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 10127.25 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10127.25. (a) The department shall prepare and send one digital or hardcopy letter to each chief financial officer of a health insurer that provides coverage, including out-of-network benefits, in California for substance use disorder in residential facilities, in accordance with the following requirements:(1) (A) The letter shall include a statement informing the health insurer that substance use disorder treatment in licensed and certified or unlicensed residential facilities is almost exclusively nonmedical, with rare exceptions.(B) The letter shall include a statement informing the health insurer of the requirements to bill nonmedical treatment accordingly.(2) The letter shall include a statement that informs the health insurer of the circumstances that allow for medical treatment for substance use disorder in licensed and certified or unlicensed residential facilities.(b) For purposes of this section, “residential facility” means a place, building, or premises that provides residential care or services. all of the following:(1) Any family home, group care facility, or similar facility determined by the department, for 24-hour nonmedical care of persons in need of personal services, supervision, or assistance essential for sustaining the activities of daily living or for the protection of the individual.(2) An alcohol or other drug program certified by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 11832) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) An alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 11834.01) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(4) A recovery residence as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 11833.05 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) The department shall consult with the State Department of Social Services, and may consult with the Department of Managed Health Care and the State Department of Health Care Services, when preparing the content of the letters required by subdivision (a).(d) The department shall send the letters required by subdivision (a) on or before ____. October 1, 2026.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 14124.17 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14124.17. (a) The department shall prepare and send one digital or hardcopy letter to each chief financial officer of a Medi-Cal managed care plan that provides coverage, including out-of-network benefits, in California for substance use disorder in residential facilities, in accordance with the following requirements:(1) (A) The letter shall include a statement informing the Medi-Cal managed care plan that substance use disorder treatment in licensed and certified or unlicensed residential facilities is almost exclusively nonmedical, with rare exceptions.(B) The letter shall include a statement informing the Medi-Cal managed care plan of the requirements to bill nonmedical treatment accordingly.(2) The letter shall include a statement that informs the Medi-Cal managed care plan of the circumstances that allow for medical treatment for substance use disorder in licensed and certified or unlicensed residential facilities.(b) For purposes of this section, “residential facility” means a place, building, or premises that provides residential care or services. all of the following:(1) Any family home, group care facility, or similar facility determined by the department, for 24-hour nonmedical care of persons in need of personal services, supervision, or assistance essential for sustaining the activities of daily living or for the protection of the individual.(2) An alcohol or other drug program certified by the department pursuant to Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 11832) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) An alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed by the department pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 11834.01) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(4) A recovery residence as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 11833.05 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) The department shall consult with the State Department of Social Services, and may consult with the Department of Managed Health Care and the Department of Insurance, when preparing the content of the letters required by subdivision (a).(d) The department shall send the letters required by subdivision (a) on or before ____. October 1, 2026.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.